Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-104.02
Auxiliary axle, defined.

Auxiliary axle means an auxiliary undercarriage assembly with a fifth wheel and tow bar used to convert a semitrailer to a full trailer, commonly known as converter gears or converter dollies.

Laws 2018, LB909, § 11.